District of Columbia statutes.
16-517

Attachment of other property in replevin action.

Where the action is to replevy specific personal property and it has not been replevied, other property may be attached in the action to recover damages and costs, and if a judgment is rendered for damages and costs, it shall carry the same rights as other judgments.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-517.
1973 Ed., § 16-517.